Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 438 Offenses Against Public Health and Safety

438.010.
Wilfully spreading smallpox. [Repealed.]

438.020.
Person under eighteen not to smoke cigarettes. [Repealed.]

438.030.
Supplying child under eighteen with cigarettes — Causing child to smoke. [Repealed.]

438.040.
Peace officer to find out from persons under eighteen where they obtained cigarettes. [Repealed.]

438.045.
Sale of tobacco products to persons under age 18 prohibited [Renumbered].

438.047.
Prohibition against certain billboard advertising of tobacco products within five hundred feet of school — Fine.

No cigarette or tobacco products advertising shall be posted on a billboard with display space larger than fifty (50) square feet located within five hundred (500) feet of any elementary or secondary school building or adjacent school-owned property.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 164, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

438.050.
Use of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, and vapor products on school premises — Exception.

Any person, except adult employees of the school system who smoke in a room on the school premises designated by the superintendent or principal for the purpose, who uses alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or vapor products in any school building or any part of any building used for school purposes, or upon school grounds, while children are assembled there for lawful purposes, except in areas in secondary schools designated and supervised by the superintendent or principal for the purpose, shall be fined not less than one dollar ($1) nor more than five dollars ($5).

The exception granted for smoking areas designated by the superintendent or principal shall extend to all schools.

History.

1277a-4: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 19, § 1; 1976, ch. 72, § 1; 1988, ch. 435, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 2019 ch. 198, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This is a penal statute which must be literally and strictly construed so there would be no violation if a person smokes a cigar or pipe but it would be a violation for anyone to smoke cigarettes in a school corridor or auditorium while children are present for lawful purposes, regardless of whether it is during or after school hours, or for a spectator to smoke cigarettes at a school football game being played on school grounds, but a person may smoke cigarettes during a summer tennis or baseball program conducted by a local recreation board and where no children are assembled.

OAG 73-175

.

Violation of this section is a misdemeanor and any peace officer may make an arrest or issue a citation for a misdemeanor committed in his presence or a citizen who witnesses a misdemeanor may go before a judge or magistrate and file a sworn complaint whereupon a warrant will be issued for the arrest of the misdemeanant.

OAG 73-175

.

As it is against the law to smoke on school property, cigarettes may not be sold on such property nor may the school designate an area outside building but on school grounds for student smoking.

OAG 74-862

.

Every school in the state can have a designated smoking room for the adult employees of the school system pursuant to this section; however, under this section, only secondary schools located in counties containing a city of the first or second class, as set forth in KRS

81.010

, or an urban-county government, can have a designated smoking area for both adults and students; accordingly, a county which does not contain a city of the first or second class or an urban-county government may only designate a smoking room for adult employees of the school system, since designating such an area by regulation for the benefit of non-employee adults and students would violate this section.

OAG 81-295

.

The county board of education in a county not containing a first or second class city or an urban-county government has no legal authority to designate a smoking area for non-employee adults or for school students since the geographical scope of this section goes to “any part of any school building used for school purposes, or upon school grounds, while children are assembled there for lawful purposes”; accordingly, this section precludes smoking in a school corridor or auditorium or even at a football game on school grounds while children are present for lawful purposes regardless of whether it is during or after school hours.

OAG 81-295

.

This section, as it is written, proscribes only the smoking of tobacco products; however, the board of education, under the authority of KRS

160.290

and KRS

160.340

, may regulate the use of tobacco products including the use of snuff or chewing tobacco in ways other than smoking by its employees, other adults or students.

OAG 81-295

.

Under the current statutes, every school may have a designated smoking room for adult employees of the school system, and every secondary school may have a designated smoking area for all individuals, adults and students.

OAG 91-119

.

This section does not grant authority to superintendents or principals beyond that authority granted to those officials by the Board, and, as currently written, does not forbid smoking of tobacco products at outdoor athletic events, depending on what smoking areas are to be designated in the schools.

OAG 91-137

.

Authority concerning the use of all tobacco products by employees, students and visitors in school buildings, on school grounds or on field trips rests with the local board of education, not with superintendents and principals, unless that authority is delegated to them by the board.

OAG 91-137

.

This section dealing with smoking on school premises directly conflicts with KRS

61.165

which requires governmental buildings that have adopted a policy limiting smoking to provide an indoor smoking room. This section controls because it is the more specific statute; therefore, KRS

61.165

, which requires that indoor smoking areas be provided in governmental buildings where smoking is restricted, does not apply to school districts.

OAG 94-52

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Taylor, With Temperate Rod: Maintaining Academic Order in Secondary Schools, 58 Ky. L.J. 616 (1970).

438.060.
Contaminating watercourse.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section any person who places or causes to be placed in any stream, dam, pool or pond any substance that renders the water unfit for use or produces a stench shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) and imprisoned for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months.

Any person who places the carcass of any beast in any watercourse or within twenty-five (25) yards of a watercourse, or casts it into any spring or pond shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than twenty dollars ($20) for the first offense and for every subsequent offense not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

1253, 1278.

438.065.
Advertising or soliciting by practitioner of healing arts — Exceptions.

No person licensed to practice medicine, dentistry, osteopathy, podiatry, optometry, or chiropractic, or any other healing art in this state shall solicit persons to become patients, or advertise by mail, card, newspaper, pamphlet, radio, television, or any other medium, or permit his services to be advertised; provided, however, that such person may publish a brief announcement of the opening of an office or of any change of office location or change of office hours, and may cause to be listed in the telephone directory and classified advertising sections thereof his name, address, type of practice and office hours. Modest signs on the doors, windows, and walls of the licensee’s office or on the building in which he maintains an office setting out his name, professional title in accordance with KRS

311.375

, office hours and address shall not be considered as violations of this subsection.

Each violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not less than one (1) month nor more than twelve (12) months or both.

Nothing contained herein prohibits the circulation of educational materials, which are not laudatory of the author or any person with whom he is associated in the practice of his profession, and which contain no solicitation of patients for the author or any such associate of the author, which has been approved as to content by the appropriate licensing agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 94, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section has a reasonable connection with the public health, safety and welfare and is a valid exercise of the police power of the state.

OAG 68-81

.

The use of the terms “general dentistry” or “family dentistry” following the listing of the name of the dentist in a telephone directory is permissible under the terms of this section.

OAG 75-348

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Podiatrists, display of license and advertising by, KRS

311.470

.

438.070.
Advertisements of venereal disease treatments. [Repealed.]

438.080.
Endurance contests. [Repealed.]

438.090.
Common drinking cup. [Repealed.]

438.100.
Fireworks defined. [Repealed.]

438.110.
Sale or use of fireworks prohibited — Exceptions for public displays. [Repealed.]

438.120.
Bond for public display permit. [Repealed.]

438.130.
Exempted uses and sales of fireworks. [Repealed.]

438.140.
Penalty for violating fireworks law. [Repealed.]

438.143.
Samples of exempted novelties to be approved by Fire Marshal before sale — Labeling. [Repealed.]

438.145.
Obstructing fire fighting operations — Penalty. [Repealed.]

438.150.
Abandoned refrigerators, iceboxes and ice chests. [Repealed.]

438.160.
Definitions for KRS 438.170, 438.180 and 438.190.

“Party line” means a subscriber’s line telephone circuit, consisting of two (2) or more main telephone stations connected therewith, each station with a distinctive ring or telephone number.

“Emergency” means a situation in which property or human life is in jeopardy and the prompt summoning of aid is essential.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 235, § 1.

438.170.
Emergency party line use.

Any person who willfully refuses to yield or surrender the use of a party line to another person for the purpose of permitting such other person to report a fire or summon police, medical or other aid in case of emergency, shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned in the county jail for a period not exceeding ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 235, § 2.

438.180.
False representation of emergency.

Any person who asks for or requests the use of a party line on the pretext that an emergency exists, knowing that no emergency in fact exists, shall be fined not less than twenty-five ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned in the county jail for a period not exceeding ten (10) days or both so fined and imprisoned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 235, § 3.

438.190.
Warning publication.

After the ninetieth day following June 14, 1962, every telephone directory thereafter published for distribution to the members of the general public shall contain a notice which explains this law, such notice to be printed in type which is no smaller than any other type on the same page and to be preceded by the word “WARNING.” The provisions of this section shall not apply to directories distributed solely for business advertising purposes, commonly known as classified directories.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 235, § 4.

438.200.
False fire or bomb alarm, penalty.
[Repealed.]

438.210.
Interfering with communications.

Any person who willfully and maliciously prevents, obstructs or delays the sending, transmission, conveyance or delivery in this state of any message, communication or report through any telegraph or telephone line, wire or cable shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 49, § 4, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Telegraphs and Telephones, § 336.00.

438.220.
Transmission of false or fraudulent communications over telegraph or telephone lines — Delay of messages.

Any person who knowingly transmits on or through any telegraph or telephone line in the state, any false communication or intelligence with intention to injure any other person or to speculate on any article of merchandise, commerce or trade, or with intent that another may do so; or any agent, officer or manager of a telegraph or telephone line who, from corrupt or improper motives or willful negligence, withholds the transmission or delivery of messages or intelligence, for which the customary charges have been paid or tendered, shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 49, § 12, effective July 15, 1980.

438.230.
Use of obscene language or proposals on telephone — Notice of law on telephone books.

Every telephone directory published for distribution to members of the general public shall contain a notice which explains that it is unlawful for any person to make use of telephone facilities or equipment for the purpose of communicating language, suggestions or proposals which are obscene, profane, lewd, lascivious or indecent in a manner reasonably to be expected to annoy, abuse, harass, torment or embarrass another, such notice to be printed in type which is no smaller than the smallest type on the same page, and to be preceded by the word “WARNING.” The provisions of this section shall not apply to directories solely for business advertising purposes, commonly known as classified directories.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 49, § 13, effective July 15, 1980.

438.240.
Abandonment or discard of refrigerator, freezer, icebox or ice chest with door or lid attached — Exception.

Whoever abandons or discards in any place accessible to children any refrigerator, freezer, icebox or ice chest, of a capacity of one and one-half (1-1/2) cubic feet or more, which has an attached lid or door which may be opened or shut, or who, being the owner, occupant, lessee, or manager of the place, knowingly permits an abandoned or discarded refrigerator, freezer, icebox or ice chest to remain there in such condition, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

A refrigerator in use for another purpose shall not be considered as discarded provided it is securely locked to prevent unauthorized entry.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 228, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

438.250.
Mandatory testing for HIV, hepatitis B and C, and tuberculosis, and other diseases for criminal defendants, inmates, and state patients under specified conditions — Effect of refusal to be tested — Costs.

When a public servant, as defined in KRS

521.010

, a health care professional who is licensed or certified under the laws of the Commonwealth, an employee of the health care professional, an employee of a health care facility that is licensed under the laws of the Commonwealth, or victim of a crime is bitten by, suffers a puncture wound caused by, or is exposed to the blood or body fluids of a criminal defendant, inmate, parolee, probationer, or patient or resident of any health facility owned or operated by the Commonwealth, or the blood or body fluids of a criminal defendant, inmate, parolee, or probationer have come into contact with the skin or unprotected clothing of a public servant during any incident in which the public servant and the criminal defendant, inmate, parolee, or probationer are involved, the criminal defendant, inmate, parolee, or probationer shall be ordered to submit to testing for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), hepatitis B and C viruses, and any other disease, if testing for that disease is recommended by the most current guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and if testing for any of these conditions is recommended, then testing will be conducted as recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

The written results of the testing shall be made available to each public servant, victim of the crime, criminal defendant, inmate, parolee, or probationer coming within the purview of subsection (1). However, the results shall not be public records and shall be disclosed to others only on a need-to-know basis. The victim of the crime shall receive written results as provided in KRS

510.320

.

If a criminal defendant, inmate, parolee, or probationer fails or refuses to be tested as ordered, he may be held in criminal contempt. A Circuit or District Judge shall compel the criminal defendant, inmate, parolee, or probationer to undergo the testing required herein if he fails or refuses to do so. Undergoing compulsory testing after a failure or refusal to be tested shall not relieve the criminal defendant, inmate, parolee, or probationer of the liability imposed by this subsection.

The costs of the testing shall be borne by the criminal defendant, inmate, parolee, or probationer unless he is determined unable to pay for the test by a court of competent jurisdiction for criminal defendants and probationers and by the Department of Corrections pursuant to their indigency standards for inmates and parolees, in which case the Commonwealth shall pay for the testing.

The provisions of subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall apply to juveniles falling within any category specified in subsections (1) to (4) of this section as well as to adults.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 309, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 606, § 122, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 345, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 400, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 432, § 11, effective July 14, 2000.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2000). This section was amended by 2000 Ky. Acts chs. 140, 345, 400, and 432, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.